testing/kom-tests-tyj.yaml
Tests:
  
  Noun - туй: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm
     туй+N+Sg+Nom: туй
     туй+N+Sg+Acc: [туй, туйӧс]
     туй+N+Sg+Gen: туйлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Abl: туйлысь
     туй+N+Sg+Dat: туйлы
     туй+N+Sg+Instr: туйӧн
     туй+N+Sg+Com: туйкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car: туйтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+Cns: туйла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp: туйся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine: туйын
     туй+N+Sg+Ela: туйысь
     туй+N+Sg+Ill: туйӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Apr: туйлань
     туй+N+Sg+Egr: туйсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl: туйӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra: туйті
     туй+N+Sg+Ter: туйӧдз
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine: туйланьын
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela: туйланьысь
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill: туйланьӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr: туйланьсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl: туйланьӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra: туйланьті
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter: туйланьӧдз
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: туйӧй
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: туйӧйлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: туйӧйлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: туйӧйлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: туйӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg1: туйнам
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: туйӧйкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Car: туйӧйтӧг
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cns: туйӧйла
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Comp: туйӧйся
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: туйсьым
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: туям
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr: туйӧйлань
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Egr: туйӧйсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: туйӧдым
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: туйтіым
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: туйӧдзым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg1: туйланьсьым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg1: туйланям
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr+Egr: туйӧйланьсянь
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg1: туйланьӧдым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg1: туйланьтіым
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg1: туйланьӧдзым
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: туйыд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: туйыдлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: туйыдлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: туйыдлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: туйтӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: туйнад
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: туйыдкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: туйтӧгыд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: туйыдла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg2: туйсяыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: туяд
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: туйсьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: туяд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: туйланьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: туйсяньыд
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: туйӧдыд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: туйтіыд
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: туйӧдзыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg2: туйланяд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg2: туйланьсьыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg2: туйланяд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxSg2: туйланьсяньыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg2: туйланьӧдыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg2: туйланьтіыд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg2: туйланьӧдзыд
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: туйыс
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: туйыслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: туйыслысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: туйыслы
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: туйсӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: туйнас
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: туйыскӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: туйтӧгыс
     туй+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: туйысла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg3: туйсяыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: туйсьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: туяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: туйланьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: туйсяньыс
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: туйӧдыс
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: туйтіыс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: туйӧдзыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg3: туйланьсьыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg3: туйланяс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxSg3: туйланьсяньыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg3: туйланьӧдыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg3: туйланьтіыс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg3: туйланьӧдзыc
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: туйным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: туйнымлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl: туйнымлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: туйнымлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: туйнымӧс
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: туйнаным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: туйнымкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: туйтӧгным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cns: туйнымла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl1: туйсяным
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: туйсьыным
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: туяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: туйланьным
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: туйсяньным
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: туйӧдным
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl1: туйтіным
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: туйӧдзным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl1: туйланяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxPl1: туйланьсьыным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl1: туйланяным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxPl1: туйланьсяньным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxPl1: туйланьӧдным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxPl1: туйланьтіным
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxPl1: туйланьӧдзным
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: туйныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: туйныдлӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl: туйныдлысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: туйныдлы
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: туйнытӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: туйнаныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: туйныдкӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: туйтӧгныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cns: туйныдла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl2: туйсяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: туяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: туйсьыныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: туяныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl2+Apr: туйныдлань
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: туйсяньныд
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: туйӧдныд
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl2: туйтіныд
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: туйӧдзныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl2: туйланяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxPl2: туйланьсьыныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl2: туйланяныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxPl2: туйланьсяньныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxPl2: туйланьӧдныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxPl2: туйланьтіныд
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxPl2: туйланьӧдзныд
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: туйныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: туйныслӧн
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: туйныслысь
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: туйныслы
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: туйнысӧ
     туй+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: туйнаныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: туйныскӧд
     туй+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: туйтӧгныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cns: туйнысла
     туй+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl3: туйсяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: туйсьыныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: туяныс
     туй+N+Sg+PxPl3+Apr: туйныслань
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: туйланьныс
     туй+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: туйсяньныс
     туй+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: туйӧдныс
     туй+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl3: туйтіныс
     туй+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: туйӧдзныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: туйланьсьыныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: туйланяныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: туйланьсяньныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: туйланьӧдныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxPl3: туйланьтіныс
     туй+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxPl3: туйланьӧдзныс
     туй+N+Pl+Nom: туйъяс
     туй+N+Pl+Acc: туйъяс
     туй+N+Pl+Acc: туйъясӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Gen: туйъяслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Abl: туйъяслысь
     туй+N+Pl+Dat: туйъяслы
     туй+N+Pl+Instr: туйъясӧн
     туй+N+Pl+Com: туйъяскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car: туйъястӧг
     туй+N+Pl+Cns: туйъясла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp: туйъясся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine: туйъясын
     туй+N+Pl+Ela: туйъясысь
     туй+N+Pl+Ill: туйъясӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Apr: туйъяслань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr: туйъяссянь
     туй+N+Pl+Prl: туйъясӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra: туйъясті
     туй+N+Pl+Ter: туйъясӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine: туйъясланьын
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela: туйъясланьысь
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill: туйъясланьӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr: туйъясланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl: туйъясланьӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra: туйъясланьті
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter: туйъясланьӧдз
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: туйъясӧй
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: туйъясӧйлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: туйъясӧйлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: туйъясӧйлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: туйъясӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg1: туйъяснам
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: туйъясӧйкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Car: туйъясӧйтӧг
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cns: туйъясӧйла
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: туйъясӧйся
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: туйъясам
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: туйъяссьым
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: туйъясам
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr: туйъясӧйлань
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Egr: туйъясӧйсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: туйъясӧдым
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg1: туйъястіым
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: туйъясӧдзым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg1: туйъясланям
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg1: туйъясланьсьым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg1: туйъясланям
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr+Egr: туйъясӧйланьсянь
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg1: туйъясланьӧдым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg1: туйъясланьтіым
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg1: туйъясланьӧдзым
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: туйъясыд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: туйъясыдлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: туйъясыдлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: туйъясыдлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: туйъястӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: туйъяснад
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: туйъясыдкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: туйъястӧгыд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: туйъясыдла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg2: туйъяссяыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: туйъясад
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: туйъяссьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: туйъясад
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: туйъясланьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: туйъяссяньыд
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: туйъясӧдыд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg2: туйъястіыд
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: туйъясӧдзыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg2: туйъясланяд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg2: туйъясланьсьыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg2: туйъясланяд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg2: туйъясланьсяньыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg2: туйъясланьӧдыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg2: туйъясланьтіыд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg2: туйъясланьӧдзыд
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: туйъясыс
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: туйъясыслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: туйъясыслысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: туйъясыслы
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: туйъяссӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: туйъяснас
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: туйъясыскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: туйъястӧгыс
     туй+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: туйъясысла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg3: туйъяссяыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: туйъясас
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: туйъяссьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: туйъясас
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: туйъясланьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: туйъяссяньыс
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: туйъясӧдыс
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg3: туйъястіыс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: туйъясӧдзыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg3: туйъясланяс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg3: туйъясланьсьыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg3: туйъясланяс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg3: туйъясланьсяньыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg3: туйъясланьӧдыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg3: туйъясланьтіыс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg3: туйъясланьӧдзыc
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: туйъясным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: туйъяснымлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: туйъяснымлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: туйъяснымлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: туйъяснымӧс
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: туйъяснаным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: туйъяснымкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: туйъястӧгным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cns: туйъяснымла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl1: туйъяссяным
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: туйъясаным
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: туйъяссьыным
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: туйъясаным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: туйъясланьным
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: туйъяссяньным
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: туйъясӧдным
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl1: туйъястіным
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: туйъясӧдзным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl1: туйъясланяным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl1: туйъясланьсьыным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl1: туйъясланяным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl1: туйъясланьсяньным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl1: туйъясланьӧдным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl1: туйъясланьтіным
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl1: туйъясланьӧдзным
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: туйъясныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: туйъясныдлӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: туйъясныдлысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: туйъясныдлы
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: туйъяснытӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: туйъяснаныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: туйъясныдкӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: туйъястӧгныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: туйъясныдла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: туйъяссяныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: туйъясаныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: туйъяссьыныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: туйъясаныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: туйъясныдлань
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: туйъяссяньныд
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: туйъясӧдныд
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl2: туйъястіныд
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: туйъясӧдзныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl2: туйъясланяныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl2: туйъясланьсьыныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl2: туйъясланяныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl2: туйъясланьсяньныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl2: туйъясланьӧдныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl2: туйъясланьтіныд
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl2: туйъясланьӧдзныд
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: туйъясныс
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: туйъясныслӧн
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: туйъясныслысь
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: туйъясныслы
